Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. Effective July 1, 2026, each state employee who was in full-
time status as of June 30, 2026, shall receive a salary increase of
eight and five-tenths percent (8.5%) on salary not in excess of
Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) or two percent (2%) on salary
in excess of Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00).
B. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to
any person employed by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education or employed by any college or university within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.

Req. No. 15063 Page 1

C. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to
any person employed by a common school district.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15063 MAH 01/10/26



















Req. No. 15063 Page 2